Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.935

Repealer.

The following acts and parts of acts are hereby repealed:

(1) Chapter 69, Laws of 1923; chapter 97, Laws of 1935; chapter 182, Laws of 1937; chapter 124, Laws of 1939; chapter 169, Laws of 1943; chapter 231, Laws of 1943; chapter 189, Laws of 1947; chapter 150, Laws of 1949; chapter 230, Laws of 1951; and RCW 21.04.010 through 21.04.220; and

(2) Chapter 178, Laws of 1937; chapter 64, Laws of 1951; and RCW 21.08.010 through 21.08.120; and

(3) Chapter 110, Laws of 1939 and RCW 21.12.010 through 21.12.080.

[ 1959 c 282 s 68.]